Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-453
Nonexclusive.

Sections 67-446 to 67-453 are not exclusive. Partnerships or limited partnerships may be converted or merged in any other manner provided by law.

Laws 1997, LB 523, § 53.